Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.080

State noxious weed list—Hearing—Adoption—Guidelines for placing plants on the list—Dissemination.

(1) The state noxious weed control board shall each year or more often, following a hearing, adopt a state noxious weed list.

(2) The state noxious weed control board shall adopt guidelines by rule for placing plants on the state noxious weed list. These guidelines must include criteria for reconsideration of proposed new species that were not adopted by the state noxious weed control board, including the need for the board to be presented with additional data from scientific sources regarding any invasive and noxious qualities of the species and from existing positive economic benefits before taking any action.

(3) Any person may request during a comment period established by the state noxious weed control board the inclusion, deletion, or designation change of any plant to the state noxious weed list.

(4) The state noxious weed control board shall send a copy of the list to each activated county noxious weed control board, to each weed district, and to the county legislative authority of each county with an inactive noxious weed control board.

(5) The record of rule making must include the written findings of the board for the inclusion of each plant on the list. The findings shall be made available upon request to any interested person.

[ 2011 c 126 s 1; 1997 c 353 s 10; 1989 c 175 s 57; 1987 c 438 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.